Montana, session 2025, SB423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 60-1-202, MCA, is amended to read:
"60-1-202. Lewis and Clark highway. There is hereby established the Lewis and Clark highway. It
shall must be composed of the following existing routes:
(1) from the Idaho state line west of Lolo Hot Springs, Montana, to the junction with U.S. highway
93 at Lolo;
(2) thence from there, north from Lolo on U.S. highway 93 to Missoula;. While in Missoula, the
Lewis and Clark highway may not run between south Higgins avenue and Arthur avenue north of, or along, 6th
south street. The department and board shall, in consultation with Missoula County and the city of Missoula,
determine an alternate route that minimizes distance traveled through primarily residential neighborhoods.
(3) thence from there, east from Missoula on U.S. highways 12 and 10 to Garrison; and
(4) thence from there, east from Garrison on U.S. highway 12 through Forsyth and Baker to the
North Dakota state line."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 423